Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 44. Local Governments Freight Rail Service Projects

§ 57-44-1.
Legislative findings and declaration of purpose.

The implementation of freight rail service projects within the State of Mississippi develops and promotes, for the public good, safety and general welfare, trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities, and promotes the general welfare of the state by creating a climate favorable to the location of new industry, trade, and commerce and the development of existing industry, trade and commerce within the State of Mississippi. Implementation of freight rail service projects within this state will develop and promote, for the public good, safety and general welfare, trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities, and will promote the general welfare of the state. It is therefore in the public interest and is vital to the public welfare of the people of Mississippi, and it is declared to be the public purpose of this chapter to so develop freight rail service projects within this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 481, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 57-44-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter the term “freight rail service project” means the acquisition, construction, installation, operation, modification, renovation, or rehabilitation of any freight rail service facilities. A project may also include any fixtures, machinery, or equipment used on, in or in connection with any such facilities. A project may be for any freight transportation purpose, provided that the department determines that the project will further the public purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 2, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-5.
Establishment of local governments freight rail service revolving loan program.

There is established a local governments freight rail service project revolving loan program to be administered by the Department of Economic and Community Development for the purpose of making loans to counties and municipalities that the governing authorities of such counties and municipalities may utilize to make loans to railroad corporations for freight rail service projects.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 3, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-7.
Local Governments Freight Rail Service Project Revolving Loan Fund; loans to counties and municipalities; repayment of loans; proceedings involving counties and municipalities in arrears on loan payments; status of evidences of indebtedness issued under chapter; renegotiation of certain loans.

There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be designated as the “Local Governments Freight Rail Service Project Revolving Loan Fund,” which fund shall consist of such monies as provided in Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39. The fund shall be maintained in perpetuity for the purposes established in this chapter. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund may not be used or expended for any purpose except as authorized under this chapter. However, the Mississippi Development Authority, in order to promote the safety of the general public, shall establish a program to permit monies from the Local Governments Freight Rail Service Project Revolving Loan Fund to be provided to counties in the form of grants to assist counties in defraying expenses relating to the upgrading of railroad grade crossings. Only projects approved by the Mississippi Department of Transportation shall be eligible for such grants. The Mississippi Development Authority, by rule and regulation, shall establish the maximum amount of any grant awarded to a county and may establish such other rules and regulations as it deems appropriate or necessary to administer the grant program and ensure that monies in the fund are made available to all counties on an equitable basis. Federal funds shall be utilized to pay not less than five percent (5%) of the cost of each project. However, the maximum amount of such grants to all counties may not exceed Eight Million Dollars ($8,000,000.00), in the aggregate.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall establish a loan program by which loans, at a rate of interest not to exceed one percent (1%) less than the federal reserve discount rate, may be made available to counties and incorporated municipalities to provide loans to counties and incorporated municipalities which may be used by the governing authorities of such counties and municipalities to provide loans to railroad corporations for freight rail service projects. Loans from the revolving fund may be made to counties and municipalities as set forth in a loan agreement in amounts established by the Mississippi Development Authority. The Mississippi Development Authority may establish a maximum amount for any loan in order to provide for broad and equitable participation in the program.

A county that receives a loan from the revolving fund shall pledge for repayment of the loan any part of the homestead exemption annual tax loss reimbursement to which it may be entitled under Section 27-33-77. An incorporated municipality that receives a loan from the revolving fund shall pledge for repayment of the loan any part of the sales tax revenue distribution to which it may be entitled under Section 27-65-75. Each loan agreement shall provide for (a) monthly payments, (b) semiannual payments, or (c) other periodic payments, the annual total of which shall not exceed the annual total for any other year of the loan by more than fifteen percent (15%). The loan agreement shall provide for the repayment of all funds received within not more than fifteen (15) years from the date of project completion.

The State Auditor, upon request of the Mississippi Development Authority, shall audit the receipts and expenditures of a county or an incorporated municipality whose loan payments appear to be in arrears, and if he finds that the county or municipality is in arrears in such payments, he shall immediately notify the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration who shall withhold all future payments to the county of homestead exemption reimbursements under Section 27-33-77 and all sums allocated to the county or the municipality under Section 27-65-75 until such time as the county or the municipality is again current in its loan payments as certified by the Mississippi Development Authority.

Evidences of indebtedness which are issued pursuant to this chapter shall not be deemed indebtedness within the meaning specified in Section 21-33-303 with regard to cities or incorporated towns, and in Section 19-9-5 with regard to counties.

The Mississippi Development Authority may, on a case-by-case basis, renegotiate the payment of principal and interest on loans made under this chapter to the six (6) most southern counties of the state covered by the Presidential Declaration of Major Disaster for the State of Mississippi (FEMA-1604-DR) dated August 29, 2005, and to incorporated municipalities located in such counties; however, the interest on the loans shall not be forgiven for a period of more than twenty-four (24) months and the maturity of the loans shall not be extended for a period of more than forty-eight (48) months.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 481, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 521, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 545, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 57-44-9.
General powers and duties of Department of Economic and Community Development.

In administering the provisions of this chapter, the Department of Economic and Community Development shall have the following powers and duties:

To supervise the use of all funds made available under this chapter;

To review all freight rail service projects for which loans are made under this chapter by local governments;

To requisition monies in the Local Governments Freight Rail Service Project Revolving Loan Fund and distribute those monies to counties and municipalities, on a project-by-project basis in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

To insure that the funds made available to a county or an incorporated municipality under this chapter provide for an equitable distribution of projects and funds among the counties and incorporated municipalities;

To maintain an accurate record of all funds made available to counties and municipalities.

To adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this chapter; and

To file annually with the Legislature a report detailing how monies in the Revolving Loan Fund were spent during the preceding fiscal year in each county and incorporated municipality, the number of freight rail service projects constructed, and the cost of each project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 5, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-11.
Resolution of necessity for issuance of state general obligation bonds; powers and duties of State Bond Commission as issuing agent; limitation on bonds; disposition of proceeds of sale of bonds and investment earnings generally.

The State Bond Commission, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for all costs incurred or to be incurred for the purposes described in Section 57-44-7. Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Mississippi Development Authority, declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this section, the Mississippi Development Authority shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the State Bond Commission. Upon receipt of such resolution, the State Bond Commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds. The total amount of bonds issued under Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 shall not exceed Eighteen Million Dollars ($18,000,000.00).

Proceeds from the sale of bonds shall be deposited in the special fund created in Section 57-44-7. Any investment earnings on amounts deposited into the special fund created in Section 57-44-7 shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 6; Laws, 2003, ch. 521, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 57-44-13.
Interest rates, maturity, and form of bonds.

The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under Section 57-44-11 shall be payable in the manner provided in this section. Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty-five (25) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 7, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-15.
Execution of bonds and interest coupons.

The bonds authorized by Section 57-44-11 shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear. However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 8, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-17.
Bonds and interest coupons deemed negotiable instruments; compliance with Uniform Commercial Code by Sate Bond Commission.

All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 shall have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this chapter, the State Bond Commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 9, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-19.
Issuance and sale of bonds by State Bond Commission; form and details of bonds; payment of interest on bonds generally.

The State Bond Commission shall act as the issuing agent for the bonds authorized under Section 57-44-11, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds. The State Bond Commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds. The State Bond Commission shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale, and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to the date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually; however, the first interest payment may be for any period of not more than one (1) year.

Notice of the sale of any such bond shall be published at least one (1) time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and in one or more other newspapers or financial journals with a national circulation, to be selected by the State Bond Commission.

The State Bond Commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39, may provide that bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 10, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-21.
Payment of principal and interest on bonds.

The bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged. If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 11, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-23.
Disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds.

Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39, the State Bond Commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the special fund created in Section 57-44-7. The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed solely upon the order of the Department of Economic and Community Development under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 12, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-25.
Requirements for issuance of bonds; adoption and effectiveness of resolution for issuance of bonds.

The bonds authorized under Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39. Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 13, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-27.
Validation of bonds.

The bonds authorized under the authority of Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds. The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 14, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-29.
Enforcement of rights of holders of bonds or coupons.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 15, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-31.
Bonds deemed legal investments and securities.

All bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 16, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-33.
Exemption from taxation of bonds.

Bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 17, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-35.
Use of proceeds of bonds.

The proceeds of the bonds issued under Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 shall be used solely for the purposes herein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 18, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-37.
Requests for and issuance of warrants for payments on bonds; transfer of funds by State Treasurer.

The State Treasurer is authorized to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accreted value of, all bonds issued under Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 19, eff from and after July 2, 1995.

§ 57-44-39.
Construction of chapter.

Sections 57-44-11 through 57-44-39 shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers herein granted, but this chapter shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 563, § 20, eff from and after July 2, 1995.